Alabama, session 2026rs, HB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
22 Section 1. This act shall apply only to Class 2
23 municipalities.
24 Section 2. Sections 11-40-65, 11-40-67, and 11-40-68,
25 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
26 "§11-40-65
27 (a) After a municipal code lien has been recorded with
28 the office of the probate judge judge of probate of the county
Page 1

the office of the probate judge judge of probate of the county
HB529 Enrolled
29 in which the real property lies, the Class 2 municipality may
30 identify those properties on which to commence a judicial in
31 rem foreclosure in accordance with this article, except that
32 those properties identified by the Class 2 municipality
33 identifies as owner occupied owner-occupied shall not be
34 subject to judicial in rem foreclosure under this article. The
35 Class 2 municipality shall not file a petition for judicial in
36 rem foreclosure in accordance with this article for a period
37 of six months following the date upon which the municipal code
38 lien is recorded in the office of the probate judge judge of
39 probate. A petition for judicial in rem foreclosure may
40 include any other municipal code lien that has been filed
41 prior to the date the petition is filed. After enforcement
42 proceedings have commenced in accordance with this article,
43 the enforcement proceedings may be amended to include any
44 subsequently arising municipal code liens and, if applicable,
45 any and all taxes as defined in this article.
46 (b) If the property on which the Class 2 municipality
47 is seeking to foreclose under this article is subject to taxes
48 as defined in this article, then at least 60 days prior to the
49 filing of the petition, the Class 2 municipality shall notify
50 the county's ad valorem tax collecting official all other
51 taxing agencies within the jurisdiction of the Class 2
52 municipality, and the State of Alabama of the Class 2
53 municipality's intention to file a petition for judicial in
54 rem foreclosure of the real property on which a municipal code
55 lien exists. Upon notification, the Revenue Commissioner
56 county's ad valorem tax collector shall provide the tax payoff
Page 2

county's ad valorem tax collector shall provide the tax payoff
HB529 Enrolled
57 amount to the Class 2 municipality.
58 (c) The Class 2 municipality shall record in the
59 appropriate lis pendens record in the office of the judge of
60 probate of the county in which the real property is located, a
61 notice of his or her its intent to file a judicial in rem
62 foreclosure action. The notice shall include a legal
63 description of the property, the property's street address of
64 the property, if available, a statement that the property is
65 subject to judicial in rem foreclosure proceedings under this
66 article, and a statement that those proceedings may extinguish
67 any legal interests in the property.
68 (d) Simultaneous with the filing of his or her the
69 notice of intent to file a judicial in rem foreclosure action,
70 the Class 2 municipality shall file a petition with the clerk
71 of the circuit court for the judicial circuit in which the
72 real property is located, the petition shall have form and
73 content substantially identical to that form as provided in
74 subsection (i).
75 (e) The petition shall be filed against the real
76 property against which the municipal code lien has been
77 recorded and shall provide all of the following:
78 (1) The identity of the Class 2 municipality.
79 (2) The real property address.
80 (3) A description of the real property.
81 (4) The tax identification number of the real property.
82 (5) The municipal code lien which that is being
83 foreclosed.
84 (6) The principal amount of the municipal code lien
Page 3

(6) The principal amount of the municipal code lien
HB529 Enrolled
85 together with applicable interest and penalties.
86 (7) The principal amount of any additional municipal
87 code liens, if any, in accordance with subsection (a) together
88 with applicable interest and penalties in accordance with
89 subsection (a) if any.
90 (8) The year or years for which the taxes are
91 delinquent, if any.
92 (9) The principal amount of the taxes together with
93 interest and penalties, if any.
94 (10) The tax payoff amount.
95 (11) A statement that upon final sale, in accordance
96 with this article and payment of the tax payoff amount, if
97 applicable, an interested party's rights of redemption under
98 Title 40, or under Chapter 10 or this title, Chapter 51 of
99 this title, shall be extinguished.
100 (12) The names and addresses of all interested parties
101 to whom copies of the petition are to be sent in accordance
102 with subsection (f).
103 (f) The Class 2 municipality shall mail copies of the
104 petition by both certified mail, return receipt requested, and
105 by regular mail to all interested parties whose identity and
106 address are reasonably ascertainable. Copies of the petition
107 shall also be mailed by first-class mail to the real property
108 address to the attention of the occupants of the property, if
109 any. In addition, notice shall be physically posted on the
110 real property and shall include the following statement: "THIS
111 PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO A JUDICIAL IN REM FORECLOSURE ACTION
112 AND MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO [NAME OF CLASS 2 MUNICIPALITY] OR
Page 4

AND MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO [NAME OF CLASS 2 MUNICIPALITY] OR
HB529 Enrolled
113 ANOTHER PARTY. PERSONS WITH INFORMATION REGARDING THE CURRENT
114 OWNER OF THE PROPERTY ARE REQUESTED TO CONTACT [NAME OF CLASS
115 2 MUNICIPALITY]."
116 (g) If the Class 2 municipality finds reason to believe
117 that the real property is owner occupied owner-occupied after
118 the filing of the petition, the Class 2 municipality shall
119 immediately seek dismissal of its petition.
120 (h) Within 30 days of the filing of the petition, the
121 Class 2 municipality shall cause a notice of the filing of the
122 petition to be published once each week for three consecutive
123 weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
124 which the property is located. Such notice shall specify:
125 (1) The name and address of the Class 2 municipality.
126 (2) The real property address.
127 (3) A description of the real property.
128 (4) The tax identification number of the real property.
129 (5) Any applicable municipal code lien upon which is
130 being foreclosed upon.
131 (6) The principal amount of any municipal code lien
132 together with interest and penalties.
133 (7) The applicable period of tax delinquency, if any.
134 (8) The principal amount of taxes, if any.
135 (9) Upon deposit with the appropriate parties by the
136 court of the tax payoff amounts, if any, any and all rights of
137 redemption accorded to interested parties under Title 40, or
138 under Chapter 10 or under this title, Chapter 51 of this
139 title, are extinguished.
140 (10) The date and place of the filing of the petition.
Page 5

(10) The date and place of the filing of the petition.
HB529 Enrolled
141 (i) The Class 2 Municipality, by local ordinance, may
142 adopt forms and policies to implement and administer this
143 section. The petition for judicial in rem foreclosure shall be
144 in substantially the following form:
145 IN THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR__________ COUNTY
146 STATE OF ALABAMA-
147 Petitioner: )
148 [Class 2 municipality] )
149 Name, Address, )
150 Telephone Number )
151 v. Civil Action No: ________
152 Respondents:
153 __________, ACRES OF LAND LYING )
154 AND BEING IN __________________, )
155 _____________COUNTY, ALABAMA )
156 __________________________________ )
157 __________________________________ )
158 (Address of Property)
159 And
160 _______________________________ )
161 Name and mailing address of Owner
162 PETITION FOR JUDICIAL IN REM FORECLOSURE COMES NOW
163 (Petitioner) and petitions this Court for judicial in rem
164 foreclosure in accordance with Section _________ of the Code
165 of Alabama 1975, by showing this Court as follows:
166 1. _________ is the owner of certain real property
167 located at ________ (the "Property") having a tax
168 identification number of _____. (A legal description of the
Page 6

identification number of _____. (A legal description of the
HB529 Enrolled
169 Property is attached hereto as Exhibit "A" and by this
170 reference incorporated herein).
171 2. The municipal code lien(s) recorded against the
172 Property by City of _____ for nonpayment of costs incurred,
173 penalties, or fees arising from violations of the City of
174 _______'s Code of Ordinances related to the Property, the
175 total amount of which is $ ________ (amount includes principal
176 amount of the municipal code lien and any accrued interest and
177 penalties as of this date) have not been paid. (An itemized
178 list of any municipal code lien recorded against the Property
179 and the subject of this Petition is attached hereto as Exhibit
180 "B" and by this reference incorporated herein.)
181 3. The taxes assessed against the Property by
182 City/County of _____ or by the State of Alabama for the
183 year(s) _____ in the amount of $ ________ (amount includes
184 principal amount of taxes owed and any accrued interest and
185 penalties as of this date) [have] [have not] been paid.
186 4. Attached hereto as Exhibit "C" is a list of the
187 names and addresses of interested parties also receiving a
188 copy of this Petition by first class mail.
189 5. Occupants of the Property shall be served by mailing
190 the petition by first-class mail to the attention of the
191 occupants at the above-listed Property address.
192 6. Based upon the information and belief of the
193 Petitioner the Property is not owner-occupied property.
194 7. The Petition has also been posted on the Property in
195 accordance with Section 11-4-54(f), Code of Alabama 1975.
196 8. Simultaneously with the filing of this Petition,
Page 7

8. Simultaneously with the filing of this Petition,
HB529 Enrolled
197 Petitioner has filed a lis pendens in the appropriate office
198 of the judge of probate.
199 WHEREFORE, Petitioner demands (1) a hearing before the
200 Circuit Court in _____ County (the "Court") and (2) a judgment
201 by the Court stating that (a) the municipal code lien recorded
202 against the Property is delinquent and (b) that notice has
203 been given to all interested parties, and an order that the
204 Court may cause the Property to be sold at public outcry in a
205 similar manner as that required in Section 40-10-15 of the
206 Code of Alabama.
207 CITY OF ______________
208 By: ___________________
209 Its: ___________________
210 NOTICE TO RESPONDENTS AND ALL INTERESTED PARTIES
211 This petition serves as notice to the respondents and
212 all interested parties that (1) each party is presumed to own
213 or have a legal interest in the property, (2) that foreclosure
214 proceedings have been commenced because of the failure to pay
215 the municipal code lien cited above, and (3) foreclosure will
216 result in the loss of ownership of the Property and all rights
217 or interests of all interested parties, including any and all
218 rights or redemption accorded to by interested parties under
219 Title 40, Chapter 10 and Title 11, Chapter 5, Code of Alabama
220 1975.
221 To avoid loss of ownership or any interest in the
222 property, payment of the full amount of the municipal code
223 lien, penalties, interest, and costs, plus payment of the full
224 amount of any property taxes that are due or delinquent, if
Page 8

amount of any property taxes that are due or delinquent, if
HB529 Enrolled
225 any, including any related penalties, interest, and costs must
226 be paid to the _____ office located at _____ by _____date.
227 Respondents and all interested parties are also reminded that
228 each of you may wish to contact an attorney to protect your
229 rights.
230 A hearing on the above matter shall take place before
231 the Circuit Court of _____ County no earlier than 30 days
232 after the filing of this petition. To determine the exact time
233 and date of such hearing, please call the office of the
234 Circuit Court of _____ County.
235 This _____ day of _____, _____.
236 __________________________
237 Circuit Clerk of ______ County
238 EXHIBIT A
239 Description of the Property
240 Together with all rights, title, and interest running
241 with the above-described property but not taxed under a
242 separate tax reference number as delineated on the tax maps of
243 the petitioner for the year(s) for the municipal code liens
244 being foreclosed.
245 EXHIBIT B
246 Names and Addresses of Interested Parties"
247 "§11-40-67
248 (a) At any point prior to the moment of the sale, any
249 interested party may redeem the real property from the sale by
250 payment of paying the redemption amount. Payment shall be made
251 to the Class 2 municipality. Following Upon receipt of the
252 payment, the Class 2 municipality shall file for dismissal of
Page 9

payment, the Class 2 municipality shall file for dismissal of
HB529 Enrolled
253 the proceedings. If any delinquent ad valorem property taxes,
254 interest, or fees are included in the redemption amount, the
255 Class 2 municipality shall remit those amounts to the county's
256 tax collecting official.
257 (b) In the event of the payment by If the owner of the
258 real property makes payment of the redemption amount, the
259 proceedings shall be dismissed, and the rights and interests
260 of all interested parties shall remain unaffected.
261 (c) In the event of payment by any interested party
262 other than the owner, the party making the payment shall
263 possess a lien on the real property for the full amount of the
264 payment, which lien shall have the same priority as the
265 municipal code lien discussed in subsection (b) of Section
266 11-40-63(b). The lienholder shall have the right to enforce
267 the lien as permitted to the holder of any lien under existing
268 law. The lienholder shall not otherwise succeed to the rights
269 of the Class 2 municipality or the tax certificate holder."
270 "§11-40-68
271 (a) Following the hearing and order of the court in
272 accordance with Section 11-40-66, the court shall order the
273 Class 2 municipality to cause a sale of sell the real
274 property. to The sale shall be advertised in a newspaper of
275 general circulation in the county where the land is
276 located.and conducted by the court in a manner similar to that
277 procedure contemplated by Section 40-10-15. The sale shall not
278 occur earlier than 45 30 days following the date of the order
279 of the court.
280 (b) Except as otherwise authorized by law, the minimum
Page 10

(b) Except as otherwise authorized by law, the minimum
HB529 Enrolled
281 bid price for the sale of the real property shall be the
282 redemption amount.
283 (1) In the absence of any bid higher than the minimum
284 bid price, the court or its designee shall submit a bid in for
285 the real property on behalf of the Class 2 municipality or its
286 designee in an amount equal to the minimum bid price, thereby
287 causing the Class 2 municipality to become the purchaser at
288 the sale pursuant to Section 11-40-66.
289 (2) A bid in submitted on behalf of the Class 2
290 municipality or its designee shall be tendered as a credit bid
291 for that part of the minimum bid price equal to the municipal
292 code lien payoff, as defined in this article. If the minimum
293 bid price bid in submitted by the Class 2 municipality
294 includes a tax payoff amount, as defined in this article, the
295 Class 2 municipality shall tender the amount of the tax payoff
296 to the court., which, together Together with the municipal
297 code lien payoff, the tax payoff shall satisfy the full amount
298 of the minimum bid price.
299 (c) Payment of the winning bid shall be due immediately
300 after the sale is conducted. The proceeds of the foreclosure
301 sale shall be distributed in the following manner:
302 (1) If the purchaser is a party other than the Class 2
303 municipality, the court or its designee shall deposit with the
304 Class 2 municipality the amount of the proceeds equal to the
305 municipal code lien payoff, less any costs incurred or fees
306 charged by the office of the judge of probate.
307 (2) If the purchaser is the Class 2 municipality, then
308 the Class 2 municipality shall tender to the court an amount
Page 11

the Class 2 municipality shall tender to the court an amount
HB529 Enrolled
309 equal to any costs incurred by the court that are included in
310 the amount of the municipal code lien payoff.
311 (3) If If the purchaser is a party other than the Class
312 2 municipality, and the minimum bid price includes a tax
313 payoff amount, the court shall deposit the amounts paid with
314 the appropriate parties in accordance with the following
315 Sections 40-5-10, 40-10-128, 40-10-129, and 40-10-193, and any
316 applicable local acts.
317 (4) In the event that the foreclosure sale price
318 exceeds the minimum bid price at the foreclosure sale, the
319 surplus shall be distributed by the court to the interested
320 parties, including the owner, as their interests appear and in
321 the order of priority in which their interests exist.
322 (d) Upon deposit with the appropriate parties by the
323 court of the tax payoff amounts, if any, described in
324 subsection (c)(3), any and all rights of redemption accorded
325 to interested parties under Title 40, or under Chapter 10 or
326 under this title, Chapter 51 of this title, are extinguished.
327 (e) From and after the moment of the sale, the sale
328 Once the sale is completed, the sale shall be considered final
329 and binding.
330 (f) Within 90 30 days following the date of the sale,
331 the court shall cause to be executed a deed to the real
332 property identified in the petition to be executed. Upon
333 execution, the court shall cause the deed to be recorded with
334 the office of the judge of probate.
335 (g) Within 90 30 days following the date of the sale,
336 the Class 2 municipality shall file a report of the sale with
Page 12

the Class 2 municipality shall file a report of the sale with
HB529 Enrolled
337 the clerk of the circuit court, which report shall identify
338 identifying whether a sale took place, the foreclosure sale
339 price, and the identity of the purchaser.
340 (h) The Class 2 municipality, by local ordinance, may
341 adopt forms and policies to implement and administer this
342 section. The form of the deed provided for in subsection (e)
343 shall be substantially as follows:
344 When recorded please return to: Cross-reference:
345 _________________________ Deed Book ____, Page
346 _________________________ _______ County, Alabama
347 Records
348 STATE OF ALABAMA
349 COUNTY OF __________
350 JUDICIAL IN REM FORECLOSURE DEED
351 This indenture (the "deed") made this _____ day of
352 _____, _____, by and between _____, a _____ ("grantor") and
353 _____, a _____ ("grantee").
354 WITNESSETH
355 WHEREAS, on the _____ day of _____, _____, during the
356 legal hours of sale, grantor did expose for sale at public
357 outcry to the highest bidder for cash before the courthouse
358 door in _____ County, Alabama, the property (as hereinafter
359 defined) at which sale grantee was the highest and best bidder
360 for the sum of $_____ and the property was then and there sold
361 to grantee for the sum. The sale was made by grantor pursuant
362 to and by virtue of the power and authority granted to it in
363 that certain order of the court granted _____, _____, Case No.
364 _____, Circuit Court of _____ County, Alabama, (the "order").
Page 13

_____, Circuit Court of _____ County, Alabama, (the "order").
HB529 Enrolled
365 Said sale was made after advertising the time, place, and
366 terms thereof in the _____, published in _____, Alabama, in
367 the aforesaid county, and being the publication in which the
368 [Class 2 municipality's] advertisements for the county are now
369 published, once a week for three consecutive weeks prior to
370 the sale on the _____, _____, _____, and _____ of _____,
371 _____, and the advertisement in all respects complied with the
372 requirements of Section _____ of the Code of Alabama 1975.
373 Notice of the time, place, and terms of the sale of the
374 property was given pursuant to Section _____ , Code of Alabama
375 1975. Sale was made for the purpose of paying the municipal
376 code lien(s) owed to _____, the interest and penalties on the
377 indebtedness, the expenses of the sale including attorneys'
378 fees, all of which were mature and payable because of failure
379 of the owner to pay the amount owed and reflected in the
380 municipal code lien.
381 NOW, THEREFORE, grantor, acting under and by virtue of
382 the order and pursuant to Section _____, Code of Alabama 1975,
383 for and in consideration of the facts hereinbefore recited,
384 has bargained, sold, and conveyed and does hereby bargain,
385 sell, and convey unto grantee, its successors and assigns, the
386 following described property (herein referred to as the
387 "property"); to wit:
388 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in
389 Land Lot _____ of the _____ District, _____ County, Alabama,
390 and being more particularly described on Exhibit "A" attached
391 hereto and by this reference made a party hereof.
392 This deed is given subject to all restrictions,
Page 14

This deed is given subject to all restrictions,
HB529 Enrolled
393 easements, rights-of-way, declarations, and covenants, if any,
394 to which the deed is junior and inferior in terms of priority.
395 TO HAVE AND TO HOLD, the property unto grantee, its
396 successors and assigns in fee simple.
397 IN TESTIMONY WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand and
398 seal, this ______ day of _____________________, 20_____.
399 ____________________________
400 Judge of the Circuit Court of ______ County
401 THE STATE OF ALABAMA,
402 __________________________ COUNTY.
403 I, _______________________________, a
404 ____________________ in and for the County, in the State of
405 Alabama, hereby certify that _________________________ whose
406 name as Judge of the Circuit Court of ________ County is
407 signed to the foregoing conveyance and who is known to me,
408 acknowledged before me, on this day, that, being informed of
409 the contents of this conveyance, he or she, in his or her
410 capacity as Judge of the Circuit Court of ___________ County,
411 executed the same voluntarily, on this day.
412 Given under my hand, this _______ day of
413 _________________________, 20______.
414 _____________________
415 EXHIBIT
416 Description of the Property
417 Together with all right, title, and interest running
418 with the above-described property but not taxed under a
419 separate tax reference number as delineated on the tax maps of
420 the petitioner for the year(s) for the municipal code lien
Page 15

the petitioner for the year(s) for the municipal code lien
HB529 Enrolled
421 being foreclosed."
422 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
423 1, 2026.
Page 16

1, 2026.
HB529 Enrolled
424
425
426
427
428
429
430
431
432
433 ________________________________________________
434 Speaker of the House of Representatives
435
436
437
438 ________________________________________________
439 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
440
441
442 House of Representatives
443
444 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
445 was passed by the House 17-Mar-26.
446
447 John Treadwell
448 Clerk
449
450
451
452
453
454 Senate 31-Mar-26 Passed
455
456
457
Page 17